src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The HUNGARIAN language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON N_HANG__n
! N_jaje
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ok@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>ot # ;
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk ;
+N+Pl00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>jai@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_MACSKA__n
! N_jaje
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%^V2VV0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%^V2VV%>k@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%^V2VV%>t # ;
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%^V2VV0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk ;
+N+Pl000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%^V2VV%>jai@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_ADÁS__n
! N_ae
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ok@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ok%>at # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>ot # ;

+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk ;
+N+Pl00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ai@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_ADÓ__n
! N_jaje
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ok@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>k%>at # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;

+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk ;
+N+Pl00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>jai@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_SÖR__n
! N_ae
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ök@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ök%>et # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ei@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_BÉKE__n
! N_jaje
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%^V2VV0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%^V2VV%>k@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%^V2VV%>t # ;
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%^V2VV0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%^V2VV%>jei@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_ESÉS__n
! N_ae
+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ök@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ek%>et # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:%>et # ;

+N+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk ;
+N+Pl0@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ei@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk
PXSG1_Om ;
PXSG2_Od ;
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_OtOk ;
PXPL3_jUk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk
PXSG1_m ;
PXSG2_d ;
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL1_nk ;
PXPL2_tOk ;
PXPL3_jUk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk
PXSG1_Om ;
PXSG2_Od ;
PXSG3_A ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_OtOk ;
PXPL3_Uk ;

LEXICON PXSG1_m
00@U.PX.SG1@:%>m@U.PX.SG1@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG1_Om
000@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>om@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
000@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2m@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG2_d
00@U.PX.SG2@:%>d@U.PX.SG2@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG2_Od
000@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>od@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
000@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2d@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG3_ZERO
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;

LEXICON PXSG3_jA
0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ja%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;
0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>je%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;
LEXICON PXSG3_A
000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>a%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;
0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>e%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;

LEXICON PXPL1_nk
0000@U.PX.PL1@:%>nk@U.PX.PL1@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL1_Unk
0000@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>unk@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ünk@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL2_tOk
0000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>tok@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>t%^Ö2k@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL2_OtOk
00000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>otok@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
00000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2t%^Ö2k@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL3_k
00@U.PX.PL3@:%>k@U.PX.PL3@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXPL3_jUk
0000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>juk@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>jük@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXPL3_Uk
000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>uk@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ük@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_
PXSG1_m ;
PXSG2_d ;
 PXSG3_ZERO ;
PXPL1_nk ;
PXPL2_tOk ;
PXPL3_k ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3
+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>t@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>t@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_
 NOUN_CASE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;
LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01
+Der/Poss_N+Sg:%>é NOUN_CASE ;
+Der/Poss_N+Pl:%>é%>i NOUN_CASE ;

LEXICON NOUN_CASE
+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>at@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>et@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
