src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
állatfogó:állatfogó N_ADÓ__n ;
almabor:almabor N_HANG__n ;
antilopfajta:antilopfajta N_MACSKA__n ;
átalakító:átalakító N_ADÓ__n ;
átköltés:átköltés N_ESÉS__n ;
bálna:bálna N_MACSKA__n ;
balszerencse:balszerencse N_BÉKE__n ;
beeresztés:beeresztés N_ESÉS__n ;
befogó:befogó N_ADÓ__n ;
belsőtőke:belsőtőke N_BÉKE__n ;
bemerítés:bemerítés N_ESÉS__n ;
beton:beton N_HANG__n ;
bóbita:bóbita N_MACSKA__n ;
bombázó:bombázó N_ADÓ__n ;
bortermés:bortermés N_ESÉS__n ;
búvárréce:búvárréce N_BÉKE__n ;
búvópatak:búvópatak N_HANG__n ;
cicamaca:cicamaca N_MACSKA__n ;
cipőhúzó:cipőhúzó N_ADÓ__n ;
csembaló:csembaló N_ADÓ__n ;
csemete:csemete N_BÉKE__n ;
csésze:csésze N_BÉKE__n ;
csőfoglalat:csőfoglalat N_HANG__n ;
csörge:csörge N_BÉKE__n ;
csutora:csutora N_MACSKA__n ;
dedikáció:dedikáció N_ADÓ__n ;
deszkakerítés:deszkakerítés N_ESÉS__n ;
disztinkció:disztinkció N_ADÓ__n ;
dróthálózat:dróthálózat N_HANG__n ;
drótkötélpálya:drótkötélpálya N_MACSKA__n ;
ébenfekete:ébenfekete N_BÉKE__n ;
elégedetlenkedés:elégedetlenkedés N_ESÉS__n ;
elektronsokszorozó:elektronsokszorozó N_ADÓ__n ;
elkeserítés:elkeserítés N_ESÉS__n ;
elme:elme N_BÉKE__n ;
előkészítés:előkészítés N_ESÉS__n ;
elverés:elverés N_ESÉS__n ;
erekció:erekció N_ADÓ__n ;
ereklye:ereklye N_BÉKE__n ;
esteledés:esteledés N_ESÉS__n ;
eszterga:eszterga N_MACSKA__n ;
évente:évente N_BÉKE__n ;
falazat:falazat N_HANG__n ;
fekete:fekete N_BÉKE__n ;
felbujtó:felbujtó N_ADÓ__n ;
felgöngyölődés:felgöngyölődés N_ESÉS__n ;
felüdülés:felüdülés N_ESÉS__n ;
fene:fene N_BÉKE__n ;
fényképfixáló:fényképfixáló N_ADÓ__n ;
filippika:filippika N_MACSKA__n ;
folyótorkolat:folyótorkolat N_HANG__n ;
folytatódó:folytatódó N_ADÓ__n ;
fúria:fúria N_MACSKA__n ;
füge:füge N_BÉKE__n ;
fűnyíró:fűnyíró N_ADÓ__n ;
gesztenye:gesztenye N_BÉKE__n ;
golfütés:golfütés N_ESÉS__n ;
golyva:golyva N_MACSKA__n ;
gratuláció:gratuláció N_ADÓ__n ;
gyárkéménysor:gyárkéménysor N_HANG__n ;
gyöngyszürke:gyöngyszürke N_BÉKE__n ;
hadihajó:hadihajó N_ADÓ__n ;
halszálka:halszálka N_MACSKA__n ;
hanghatár:hanghatár N_HANG__n ;
hántolóeke:hántolóeke N_BÉKE__n ;
hasmenés:hasmenés N_ESÉS__n ;
hindu:hindu N_ADÓ__n ;
hóeke:hóeke N_BÉKE__n ;
hossztalpfa:hossztalpfa N_MACSKA__n ;
hőfejlesztés:hőfejlesztés N_ESÉS__n ;
húr:húr N_HANG__n ;
író:író N_ADÓ__n ;
jáde:jáde N_BÉKE__n ;
járda:járda N_MACSKA__n ;
jégkorszak:jégkorszak N_HANG__n ;
kaptafa:kaptafa N_MACSKA__n ;
karózat:karózat N_HANG__n ;
kártyavetés:kártyavetés N_ESÉS__n ;
kavarókemence:kavarókemence N_BÉKE__n ;
kemence:kemence N_BÉKE__n ;
kesztyűtágító:kesztyűtágító N_ADÓ__n ;
kicsipkedés:kicsipkedés N_ESÉS__n ;
kikészítés:kikészítés N_ESÉS__n ;
kisafa:kisafa N_MACSKA__n ;
kitüntetés:kitüntetés N_ESÉS__n ;
konstrukció:konstrukció N_ADÓ__n ;
kontár:kontár N_HANG__n ;
korpa:korpa N_MACSKA__n ;
köpőcsésze:köpőcsésze N_BÉKE__n ;
közbevetés:közbevetés N_ESÉS__n ;
kvantor:kvantor N_HANG__n ;
lábikra:lábikra N_MACSKA__n ;
lefekvés:lefekvés N_ESÉS__n ;
legó:legó N_ADÓ__n ;
levélszedés:levélszedés N_ESÉS__n ;
levente:levente N_BÉKE__n ;
lóca:lóca N_MACSKA__n ;
lőgyakorlat:lőgyakorlat N_HANG__n ;
matrica:matrica N_MACSKA__n ;
megalázkodó:megalázkodó N_ADÓ__n ;
megérlelés:megérlelés N_ESÉS__n ;
megkeményedés:megkeményedés N_ESÉS__n ;
megsemmisülés:megsemmisülés N_ESÉS__n ;
meggyőzés:meggyőzés N_ESÉS__n ;
mente:mente N_BÉKE__n ;
modor:modor N_HANG__n ;
moha:moha N_MACSKA__n ;
nézőke:nézőke N_BÉKE__n ;
nosztalgia:nosztalgia N_MACSKA__n ;
nyakló:nyakló N_ADÓ__n ;
nyomdászat:nyomdászat N_HANG__n ;
osztriga:osztriga N_MACSKA__n ;
öregedés:öregedés N_ESÉS__n ;
összeszorító:összeszorító N_ADÓ__n ;
páncélzat:páncélzat N_HANG__n ;
paróka:paróka N_MACSKA__n ;
pelyhe:pelyhe N_BÉKE__n ;
pneumatika:pneumatika N_MACSKA__n ;
pókféle:pókféle N_BÉKE__n ;
polcsor:polcsor N_HANG__n ;
pótadó:pótadó N_ADÓ__n ;
rabszolga:rabszolga N_MACSKA__n ;
repertoár:repertoár N_HANG__n ;
rezgés:rezgés N_ESÉS__n ;
rezorpció:rezorpció N_ADÓ__n ;
rizike:rizike N_BÉKE__n ;
rovátka:rovátka N_MACSKA__n ;
sikátor:sikátor N_HANG__n ;
sörte:sörte N_BÉKE__n ;
spiritiszta:spiritiszta N_MACSKA__n ;
sportautó:sportautó N_ADÓ__n ;
szélrózsa:szélrózsa N_MACSKA__n ;
szénpor:szénpor N_HANG__n ;
szenzáció:szenzáció N_ADÓ__n ;
szétterjedés:szétterjedés N_ESÉS__n ;
szőlőtőke:szőlőtőke N_BÉKE__n ;
szövetminta:szövetminta N_MACSKA__n ;
talár:talár N_HANG__n ;
tányérszárító:tányérszárító N_ADÓ__n ;
teniszjátszma:teniszjátszma N_MACSKA__n ;
terhe:terhe N_BÉKE__n ;
tor:tor N_HANG__n ;
torzó:torzó N_ADÓ__n ;
trécselés:trécselés N_ESÉS__n ;
tündérmese:tündérmese N_BÉKE__n ;
ütőkártya:ütőkártya N_MACSKA__n ;
vádirat:vádirat N_HANG__n ;
választható:választható N_ADÓ__n ;
vese:vese N_BÉKE__n ;
vigyor:vigyor N_HANG__n ;
visszaszerzés:visszaszerzés N_ESÉS__n ;
vízió:vízió N_ADÓ__n ;
zsúr:zsúr N_HANG__n ;
magyaróra:magyaróra N_MACSKA__n ;
mézsör:mézsör N_SÖR__n ;
sör:sör N_SÖR__n ;
aszpik:aszpik N_HANG__n ;
hajválaszték:hajválaszték N_HANG__n ;
körgallér:körgallér N_HANG__n ;
potyadék:potyadék N_HANG__n ;
vasoxid:vasoxid N_HANG__n ;
